Maryland, session 2025, SB0605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
13–402.
(a) If a notice and demand for a return is made under § 13–303 of this title and
the person or governmental unit fails to file the return, the tax collector shall:
(6) for digital advertising gross revenues tax:
(i) estimate gross revenues from the best information in possession
of the tax collector; and
(ii) assess the tax due on the estimated assessable base.
13–508.
– 1 –

Ch. 678 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax, DIGITAL
ADVERTISING GROSS REVENUES TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax,
public service company franchise tax, financial institution franchise tax, sales and use tax,
or tobacco tax is mailed, a person or governmental unit against which the assessment is
made may submit to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(b) If a person or governmental unit fails to submit an application for revision or
claim for refund within the time allowed in subsection (a) of this section, the assessment
becomes final.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
DIGITAL ADVERTISING GROSS REVENUES TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel
tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax application for revision or claim for refund under
subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
(d) The Department promptly:
(1) (i) shall act on a person’s public service company franchise tax or
financial institution franchise tax application for revision under subsection (a) of this
section; or
(ii) 1. shall hold an informal hearing after giving reasonable
notice to the person; and
2. after the hearing:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 678
A. shall act on the application for revision; and
B. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person a notice of final determination.
13–509.
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, DIGITAL ADVERTISING GROSS REVENUES TAX, income
tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax under § 13–508(a)
of this subtitle, the Comptroller or the Comptroller’s designee may issue an order
decreasing or abating an assessment to correct an erroneous assessment.
(b) If action is taken under subsection (a) of this section, the order shall state
clearly the reasons for decreasing or abating the assessment.
(c) Any order issued by the Comptroller under subsection (a) of this section shall
be final and not subject to appeal.
(d) The Comptroller’s refusal to enter an order under subsection (a) of this section
shall be final and not subject to appeal.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to assessments of the digital advertising gross
revenues tax made after December 31, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –